Mississippi, session 2026, HB968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-3-82, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-3-82.  (1)  There is hereby established the Mississippi Community Oriented Policing Services in Schools (MCOPS) grant program in the State Department of Education to provide funding, pursuant to specific appropriation by the Legislature therefor, to assist law enforcement agencies in providing additional School Resource Officers to engage in community policing in and around primary and secondary schools.  The MCOPS program shall authorize the State Department of Education to make grants to increase deployment of law enforcement officers in order (a) to increase or enhance community policing in this state, (b) that trained, sworn enforcement officers assigned to schools play an integral part in the development and/or enhancement of a comprehensive school safety plan, and (c) that the presence of these officers shall provide schools with a direct link to local law enforcement agencies. (2)  The MCOPS program shall meet the following requirements and standards: (a)  This program shall provide an incentive for law enforcement agencies to build collaborative partnerships with the school community and to use community policing efforts to combat school violence and implement educational programs to improve student and school safety. (b)  The additional School Resource Officers must devote at least seventy-five percent (75%) of their time to work in and around primary and secondary schools, in addition to the time that School Resource Officers are devoting in the absence of the MCOPS in Schools grant. (c)  Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, the MCOPS in Schools program shall provide a minimum state contribution of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per officer position over the one-year grant period, to be matched from local funds on a 50/50 matching basis.  Officers paid with MCOPS funds may be employed by the local law enforcement agency or by the local school district.  MCOPS funds may be used to pay for entry-level salaries and benefits of newly trained additional School Resource Officers and may be used to pay the salaries and benefits of School Resource Officers employed prior to July 1, 2013.  All jurisdictions that apply must demonstrate that they have primary law enforcement authority over the school(s) identified in their application and demonstrate their inability to implement this project without state assistance.  Schools or law enforcement agencies may not reduce its overall federal, state, locally funded level of sworn officers (including other School Resource Officers or other sworn officers assigned to the schools) as a result of applying for or receiving MCOPS in Schools grant funding.  MCOPS in Schools funding may be used to rehire sworn officers previously employed who have been laid off for financial reasons unrelated to the availability of the MCOPS in Schools grant, but must obtain prior written approval from the State Department of Education.  MCOPS in Schools funding may be used to train school resource officers.  In order to be eligible for such program, each local school board desiring to participate shall apply to the State Department of Education by May 31 before the beginning of the applicable fiscal year on forms provided by the department.  The State Department of Education shall determine by July 1 of each succeeding year which local school districts have submitted approved applications for School Resource Officer funding. (d)  School Resource Officers (SROs) may serve in a variety of roles, including, but not limited to, that of a law enforcement officer/safety specialist, law-related educator, and problem-solver/community liaison.  These officers may teach programs such as crime prevention, substance abuse prevention, and gang resistance as well as monitor and assist troubled students through mentoring programs.  The School Resource Officer(s) may also identify physical changes in the environment that may reduce crime in and around the schools, as well as assist in developing school policies which address criminal activity and school safety. The application must also include a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU), signed by the law enforcement executive and the appropriate school official(s), to document the roles and responsibilities to be undertaken by the law enforcement agency and the educational school partner(s) through this collaborative effort.  While acting within the scope of their official law enforcement capacity, school resource officers may, with reasonable suspicion that a student is engaged in unlawful activity, as defined under Section 37-11-29(6), within a school facility or upon educational property, so as to establish probable cause, detain and conduct a search of the person and possessions of the student presumed to be engaged in unlawful activity, which is reasonable in scope and not excessively intrusive in light of the student's ages, sex and nature of the suspected unlawful activity.  Any search executed by a school resource officer under the authority of this subsection must comply with constitutional protections afforded students under the Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution.  The application must also include a Narrative Addendum to document that the School Resource Officer(s) will be assigned to work in and around primary or secondary schools and provide supporting documentation in the following areas:  problem identification and justification, community policing strategies to be used by the officers, quality and level of commitment to the effort, and the link to community policing. (e)  All agencies receiving awards through the MCOPS in Schools program are required to send the School Resource Officer position(s) funded by this grant, to the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy where they shall be required to participate in training through the Advanced Law Enforcement Rapid Response Training Program at the academy, with the cost to be defrayed from the MCOPS program.  The MCOPS Office of the State Department of Education will reimburse grantees for training, per diem, travel, and lodging costs for attendance of required participants up to a maximum of One Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) per person attending.  Applicants receiving an MCOPS in Schools grant, will receive additional training information following notification of the grant award.  The MCOPS in Schools training requirement must be completed prior to the end of twelve-month grant funding for officer positions. (3)  The State Department of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations prescribing procedures for the application, expenditure requirements and the administration of the Mississippi Community Oriented Policing Services in Schools (MCOPS) program established in this section, and shall make a report on the implementation of the MCOPS program with any recommendations to the 2020 Regular Session of the Legislature. SECTION 2.  Section 37-11-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-29.  (1)  (a) Any principal, teacher or other school employee who has knowledge of any unlawful activity which occurred on educational property or during a school related activity or which may have occurred shall report such activity to the superintendent of the school district or his designee who shall notify the appropriate law enforcement officials as required by this section.  In the event of an emergency or if the superintendent or his designee is unavailable, any principal may make a report required under this subsection. (b)  While acting within the scope of their official law enforcement capacity, school resource officers may, with reasonable suspicion that a student is engaged in unlawful activity, as defined under subsection (6), within a school facility or upon educational property, so as to establish probable cause, detain and conduct a search of the person and possessions of the student presumed to be engaged in unlawful activity, which is reasonable in scope and not excessively intrusive in light of the student's ages, sex and nature of the suspected unlawful activity.  Any search executed by a school resource officer under the authority of this subsection must comply with constitutional protections afforded students under the Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution. (2)  Whenever any person who shall be an enrolled student in any school or educational institution in this state supported in whole or in part by public funds, or who shall be an enrolled student in any private school or educational institution, is arrested for, and lawfully charged with, the commission of any crime and convicted upon the charge for which he was arrested, or convicted of any crime charged against him after his arrest and before trial, the office or law enforcement department of which the arresting officer is a member, and the justice court judge and any circuit judge or court before whom such student is tried upon said charge or charges, shall make or cause to be made a report thereof to the superintendent or the president or chancellor, as the case may be, of the school district or other educational institution in which such student is enrolled. If the charge upon which such student was arrested, or any other charges preferred against him are dismissed or nol prossed, or if upon trial he is either convicted or acquitted of such charge or charges, same shall be reported to said respective superintendent or president, or chancellor, as the case may be.  A copy of said report shall be sent to the Secretary of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning of the State of Mississippi, at Jackson, Mississippi. Said report shall be made within one (1) week after the arrest of such student and within one (1) week after any charge placed against him is dismissed or nol prossed, and within one (1) week after he shall have pled guilty, been convicted, or have been acquitted by trial upon any charge placed against him.  This section shall not apply to ordinary traffic violations involving a penalty of less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and costs. The State Superintendent of Public Education shall gather annually all of the reports provided under this section and prepare a report on the number of students arrested as a result of any unlawful activity which occurred on educational property or during a school related activity.  All data must be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, school, offense and law enforcement agency involved.  However, the report prepared by the State Superintendent of Public Education shall not include the identity of any student who was arrested. On or before January 1 of each year, the State Superintendent of Public Education shall report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Joint PEER Committee on this section.  The report must include data regarding arrests as a result of any unlawful activity which occurred on educational property or during a school related activity. (3)  When the superintendent or his designee has a reasonable belief that an act has occurred on educational property or during a school related activity involving any of the offenses set forth in subsection (6) of this section, the superintendent or his designee shall immediately report the act to the appropriate local law enforcement agency.  For purposes of this subsection, "school property" shall include any public school building, bus, public school campus, grounds, recreational area or athletic field in the charge of the superintendent.  The State Board of Education shall prescribe a form for making reports required under this subsection.  Any superintendent or his designee who fails to make a report required by this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 37-11-35. (4)  The law enforcement authority shall immediately dispatch an officer to the educational institution and with probable cause the officer is authorized to make an arrest if necessary as provided in Section 99-3-7. (5)  Any superintendent, principal, teacher or other school personnel participating in the making of a required report pursuant to this section or participating in any judicial proceeding resulting therefrom shall be presumed to be acting in good faith. Any person reporting in good faith shall be immune from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. (6)  For purposes of this section, "unlawful activity" means any of the following: (a)  Possession or use of a deadly weapon, as defined in Section 97-37-1; (b)  Possession, sale or use of any controlled substance; (c)  Aggravated assault, as defined in Section 97-3-7; (d)  Simple assault, as defined in Section 97-3-7, upon any school employee; (e)  Rape, as defined under Mississippi law; (f)  Sexual battery, as defined under Mississippi law; (g)  Murder, as defined under Mississippi law; (h)  Kidnapping, as defined under Mississippi law; or (i)  Fondling, touching * * *, or handling * * *, etc., a child for lustful purposes, as defined in Section 97-5-23. For the purposes of this subsection (6), the term "controlled substance" does not include the possession or use of medical cannabis that is lawful under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.